Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.171

Electrical trainee hours—Audit—Rules—Confidentiality.

The department may audit the records of an electrical contractor that has verified the hours of experience submitted by an electrical trainee to the department under RCW 19.28.161(2) in the following circumstances: Excessive hours were reported; hours reported outside the normal course of the contractor's business; the type of hours reported do not reasonably match the type of permits purchased; or for other similar circumstances in which the department demonstrates a likelihood of excessive hours being reported. The department shall limit the audit to records necessary to verify hours. The department shall adopt rules implementing audit procedures. Information obtained from an electrical contractor under the provisions of this section is confidential and is not open to public inspection under chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2005 c 274 s 234; 2001 c 211 s 11; 1996 c 241 s 2. Formerly RCW 19.28.515.]